District of Columbia statutes.
31-5511

Examination of the Association.

The Association shall be subject to examination and regulation by the Mayor. The board of directors shall submit, not later than March 30th of each year, a financial report for the preceding calendar year in a form approved by the Mayor.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 12, 40 DCR 6120
1981 Ed., § 35-3911.